Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.190

Violations—Injunctions and legal proceedings authorized.

The secretary of health or local health officer may bring an action to enjoin a violation or the threatened violation of any of the provisions of the public health laws of this state or any rules or regulation made by the state board of health or the department of health pursuant to said laws, or may bring any legal proceeding authorized by law, including but not limited to the special proceedings authorized in Title 7 RCW, in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur, or in the superior court of Thurston county. Upon the filing of any action, the court may, upon a showing of an immediate and serious danger to residents constituting an emergency, issue a temporary injunctive order ex parte.

[ 1990 c 133 s 3; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 258; 1979 c 141 s 55; 1967 ex.s. c 102 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.20A.650 and 43.20.170.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1990 c 133: See notes following RCW 36.94.140.

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 102: See note following RCW 43.70.130.